Wyoming statutes. Title 7 Criminal Procedure
Article 3. Probation and Suspension of Sentence
§ 7-13-304.
Imposition or modification of conditions; performance of work by defendant.

The court may impose, and at any time modify, any condition of probation or suspension of sentence. The court may not impose new custodial restrictions on liberty unless in response to a compliance violation, a new violation of law or absconding from supervision and only after providing notice and a hearing if required under W.S.

7-13-1803

.

As a condition of any probation, the court, subject to W.S.

7-16-101

through

7-16-104

, may order the defendant to perform work for a period not exceeding the maximum probation period.

As a condition of probation or suspension of sentence, the court may require a defendant who is a minor to successfully complete a juvenile service program offered under the Community Juvenile Services Act.

As a condition of probation or suspension of sentence, the court may require a defendant to complete successfully a court supervised treatment program qualified under W.S.

7-13-1601

through

7-13-1615

, a 24/7 sobriety program under W.S.

7-13-1701

through

7-13-1710

, or both.

As a condition of probation or suspension of sentence for a person convicted of an offense under W.S.

6-4-304

, the court may require a defendant to complete successfully a sex offender treatment program.

History.

Laws 1939, ch. 91, § 3; C.S. 1945, § 10-1903; W.S. 1957, § 7-320; W.S. 1977, §

7-13-303

; Laws 1984, ch. 68, § 1; 1987, ch. 157, § 3; 1997, ch. 181, § 2; 2009, ch. 145, § 2; 2013 ch. 20, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2014 ch. 47, § 2, effective July 1, 2014; 2019 ch. 49, § 2, effective July 1, 2019; 2019 ch. 116, § 2, effective July 1, 2019; 2021 ch. 141, § 1, effective April 8, 2021.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, added (d).

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, deleted “by a community juvenile services board” following “program offered”
in (c).

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, added “a 24/7 sobriety program under W.S.

7-13-1701

through

7-13-1711

, or both” at the end of (d).

The 2019 amendments. —

The first 2019 amendment by ch. 49, § 2, effective July 1, 2019, in (d), substituted "W.S.

7-13-1701

through

7-13-1710

" for "W.S.

7-13-1701

through

7-13-1711

" near the end.

The second 2019 amendment, by ch. 116, § 2, effective July 1, 2019, in (a) added the second sentence.

The 2021 amendment

added (e).

Laws 2021, ch. 141, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 7, 2021.

Subsection (a) superseded by criminal rules. —

The language of subsection (a), relating to imposition or modification of sentence conditions, seems to be in sufficient conflict with Rule 32, W.R. Cr. P., that this provision should be considered as having been superseded. Chapman v. State, 728 P.2d 631,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 662

(Wyo. 1986).

Court cannot assess prosecution costs. —

Because the legislature, in enacting §

6-10-104

, specifically deleted the language permitting assessment of costs of prosecution, the trial judge exceeded his authority by assessing costs of prosecution as a condition of probation. Burke v. State, 746 P.2d 852,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 550

(Wyo. 1987).

Right to presence at hearing. —

Defendant's constitutional rights were not violated when district court denied his requests to modify terms of his probation or to discharge him from probation without his presence at the hearing; Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 7-13-304(a) and Wyo. R. Crim. P. 39(b) did not mandate that district court hold a hearing on defendant's motions for modification of his probation, and consequently was not entitled to be present at the gratuitous hearing that was held.
Demillard v. State, 2008 WY 93, 190 P.3d 128,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 97

(Wyo. 2008).

Surrender of driver's license. —

A trial court did not abuse its discretion when it ordered a convicted felon to surrender his driver's license as a condition of probation. Meerscheidt v. State, 931 P.2d 220,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 1997).

Condition of probation. —

While the record contained no indication that the district court ordered preparation of the required restitution plan, that failure did not affect the validity of the challenged probation conditions. Anderson v. State, 2018 WY 6, 408 P.3d 1148,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 2018).

It would be nonsensical to allow the sentencing court full discretion to set restitution terms as part of a restitution plan, but declare that exercise of discretion invalid if the court orders the same terms as separate probation conditions, and there is nothing that requires such a result; a district court has authority to impose restitution-related probation conditions in a restitution plan or separately, and the district court did not abuse its discretion or exceed its authority in imposing such conditions in this case. Anderson v. State, 2018 WY 6, 408 P.3d 1148,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 2018).

Defendant failed to take responsibility for her own financial circumstances, used her disabled brother’s resources to pay for items such as cell phone and cable television services, and did not recognize the wrong she had committed, and thus the district court did not abuse its discretion in imposing the probation condition that restricted her from purchasing cable television or cell phone services; the restriction was related to her crime. Anderson v. State, 2018 WY 6, 408 P.3d 1148,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 2018).

Neither the State nor defendant claimed the liquidation condition, which directed liquidation of defendant’s recreational assets, did not meet the reasonable relation requirement; there was no error in the district court’s imposition of this condition. Anderson v. State, 2018 WY 6, 408 P.3d 1148,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 2018).

Where a defendant entered Alford guilty pleas to violating Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§

6-2-502

,

6-4-103

,

6-1-303

, and

6-2-302

, the district court did not abuse its discretion by imposing as a condition of his probation following his term of incarceration that he have no contact with his minor children. A no contact condition was reasonably related to the violent sexual crimes for which he was convicted and for which he was charged, and the provision did not impermissibly encroach on his fundamental right as a parent to raise his children. Perkins v. State, 2014 WY 11, 317 P.3d 584,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 2014).

Applied

in

Sanderson v. State, 649 P.2d 677,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 372

(Wyo. 1982).

Cited

in

Wlodarczyk v. State, 836 P.2d 279,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 80

(Wyo. 1992).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Reforming Criminal Sentencing in Wyoming,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 575 (1985).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Propriety of conditioning probation on defendant's remaining childless or having no additional children during probationary period, 94 ALR3d 1218.

Propriety of requirement, as condition of probation, that defendant refrain from use of intoxicants, 19 ALR4th 1251.

Validity of condition of probation, supervised release, or parole restricting computer use or internet access, 4 A.L.R.6th 1.

§ 7-13-305.
Determination, continuance or extension; revocation proceedings.

The period of probation or suspension of sentence under W.S.

7-13-302

shall be determined by the court and may be reduced, continued or extended. Any term of probation including any continuations or extensions shall not exceed the maximum term of probation authorized under W.S.

7-13-302

(b), except that the judge may impose a term of probation that is not greater than the maximum term of imprisonment authorized by law for the offense for good cause shown upon the record and after considering public safety, rehabilitation, deterrence and any other goals of sentencing. In determining the period of probation or a modification of an existing probation, the court may consider, but is not limited to the following factors:

Whether the defendant has stable employment;

Whether the defendant has positive community support;

Whether the defendant has positive familial support;

Whether the defendant has reasonably attended to spousal or parental responsibilities and whether the terms of probation assist or hinder the defendant in discharging those responsibilities;

Whether the defendant has made progress in affirmatively addressing any alcohol or substance abuse issues. For the purposes of this paragraph, relapse alone does not prevent the court from determining the defendant has made progress in addressing his alcohol or substance use issues;

The nature and seriousness of the underlying crime;

The risk posed by the defendant to the community;

The risk of reoffense as determined by a validated risk assessment tool utilized by the department of corrections.

Upon the satisfactory fulfillment of the conditions of suspension of sentence or probation under W.S.

7-13-302

the court shall enter an order discharging the defendant.

For a violation of a condition of probation occurring during the probationary period, revocation proceedings may be commenced at any time during the period of suspension of sentence or probation under W.S.

7-13-302

, or within thirty (30) days thereafter, in which case the court may issue a warrant and cause the defendant to be arrested. If after hearing the court determines that the defendant violated any of the terms of probation or suspension of sentence, the court may proceed to deal with the case as if no suspension of sentence or probation had been ordered.

The time for commencing revocation proceedings shall be automatically extended for any period of time in which the probationer is incarcerated outside this state during the probationary period for the conviction of an offense which is a violation of the conditions of probation, unless the probationer has made a valid request for final disposition under the interstate agreement on detainers, W.S.

7-15-101

through

7-15-105

.

History.

Laws 1939, ch. 91, § 4; C.S. 1945, § 10-1904; W.S. 1957, § 7-321; W.S. 1977, §

7-13-304

; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3; 2019 ch. 37, § 1, effective February 15, 2019; 2019 ch. 101, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

Agreement on detainers. —

See §

7-15-102

and notes thereto.

The 2019 amendments. —

The first 2019 amendment by ch. 37, § 1, inserted "reduced" preceding "continued or extended," added the last sentence in (a), and added (a)(i) through (a)(viii).

Laws 2019, ch. 37, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved February 15, 2019.

The second 2019 amendment, by ch. 101, § 2, effective July 1, 2019, in (a) added the second sentence.

Applicability. —

Laws 2019, ch. 101, § 2 effective July 1, 2019, states the following: “The provisions of this act shall apply to all persons who are sentenced or placed on probation pursuant to
W.S.

7-13-301

,

7-13-302

and

35-7-1037

on or after the effective date of this act.”

Initiation of revocation proceedings during probationary period.—

Lower court had the authority to revoke defendant’s probation because the probation violation occurred during the probationary period in that, following defendant’s no contest plea, the court suspended the execution of defendant’s sentence in one case and placed defendant on supervised probation. Then, after defendant violated the conditions of the probationary sentence imposed in another case, the court commenced probation revocation proceedings against defendant during the period in which the execution of that sentence was suspended. Sena v. State, 2019 WY 111, 451 P.3d 1143,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 113

(Wyo. 2019).

Defendant was not deprived of right to speedy sentence,

where he was placed on probation without any determination of a sentence of confinement and, approximately two years later, a prison term was specified upon the revocation of his probation. The fact that the court continued to manage a lawfully imposed sentence did not equate to an unreasonable delay in sentencing. Davila v. State, 815 P.2d 848,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 127

(Wyo. 1991).

“Probation” defined. —

“Probation” means a sentence not involving confinement which imposes conditions and retains authority in the sentencing court to modify the conditions of the sentence or to resentence the offender if he violates the conditions. Smith v. State, 598 P.2d 1389,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 449

(Wyo. 1979).

Sentencing judge has continuing, personal jurisdiction over probationer

and inherent power to revoke or grant probation. Smith v. State, 598 P.2d 1389,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 449

(Wyo. 1979).

Court is not given unlimited authority as to length of probation.

Hicklin v. State, 535 P.2d 743,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 142

(Wyo. 1975).

Duration cannot exceed maximum term of imprisonment authorized.
—

Probation is constructive confinement, and the restraints of probation cannot exceed a period in excess of the maximum term of imprisonment authorized by the statute violated. Hicklin v. State, 535 P.2d 743,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 142

(Wyo. 1975).

Although defendant's maximum term of imprisonment for two convictions under former §

14-3-105

(now repealed) (the statute prohibiting immoral or indecent acts) was 10 years, his original sentence was imprisonment for not less than 18 months nor more than 60 months. However, defendant was placed on probation for a period of eight years, but five months after the original sentencing hearing had been held, the district court revoked defendant's probation and reinstated his original sentence. Because neither appellant's period of probation nor his term of incarceration exceeded the maximum term of imprisonment, his sentence was legal. Leyba v. State, 882 P.2d 863,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 118

(Wyo. 1994).

And maximum fine limits amount of bond. —

To permit the trial court to require a bond of $50,000.00 as a condition of probation where defendant was convicted of violating former § 6-4-506(b), as to assault with a dangerous weapon, would enlarge the punitive power of the court far beyond that contemplated by the laws of this state, since the largest bond for performance of the conditions of probation in such a case would be $1,000.00, less the amount of any fine assessed. Hicklin v. State, 535 P.2d 743,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 142

(Wyo. 1975).

Initiation of revocation proceedings during probationary period.
—

While this section obviously does not require that revocation proceedings be completed within the probationary period, it does require that such proceedings be initiated during the period. Lackey v. State, 731 P.2d 565,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 386

(Wyo. 1987).

Under subsection (d) of this section, the term of probation is tolled during the period of incarceration unless the conditions articulated in the statute are met and, in such an instance, the time of incarceration must be added to the period of probation before any discharge by operation of law can occur. Jibben v. State, 901 P.2d 1099,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 138

(Wyo. 1995).

Brunsvold v. State, 864 P.2d 34,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 178

(Wyo. 1993).

Failure to pay restitution. —

Trial court properly found a willful failure to pay restitution where the evidence showed that defendant, an able-bodied man, failed to look for other employment after his family business folded, failed to borrow money, or seek a modification of his probation terms. Therefore, there was no due process violation when his probation was revoked.
Ramsdell v. State, 2006 WY 159, 149 P.3d 459,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 182

(Wyo. 2006).

Failure to comply with probation requirement. —

District court erred in revoking probation on the ground that probationer failed to admit any sexual misconduct to a therapist because the probationary condition at issue simply required probationer to submit to a sex offender evaluation, not specifically to admit misconduct.
Neidlinger v. State, 2007 WY 204, 173 P.3d 376,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 214

(Wyo. 2007).

Discharge by operation of law. —

A discharge by operation of law does not occur until 30 days after the expiration of the term of probation under subsection (c) of this section. Jibben v. State, 901 P.2d 1099,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 138

(Wyo. 1995).

Under subsection (d) of this section, the term of probation is tolled during the period of incarceration unless the conditions articulated in the statute are met and, in such an instance, the time of incarceration must be added to the period of probation before any discharge by operation of law can occur. Jibben v. State, 901 P.2d 1099,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 138

(Wyo. 1995).

Reasonable time standard governs. —

As to the completion of the revocation proceedings, a reasonable time standard governs. Jibben v. State, 901 P.2d 1099,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 138

(Wyo. 1995).

Reimposition of sentence. —

After defendant admitted five violations of his probationary conditions, the district court did not abuse its discretion under this section by reimposing sentence upon revocation of defendant's probation for felony interference with a peace officer. The district court exercised its conscientious judgment by considering the history of the case, the probation violations, and defendant's request to be returned to supervised probation.
Castillo v. State, 2012 WY 3, 268 P.3d 245,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 2012).

Sentencing judge may preside at probation revocation hearing.
—

A probationer is not entitled to peremptorily disqualify the sentencing district court judge from presiding at a probation revocation hearing. Smith v. State, 598 P.2d 1389,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 449

(Wyo. 1979).

Quoted

in

Schepp v. Fremont County, 900 F.2d 1448,

1990 U.S. App. LEXIS 4606

(10th Cir. 1990); Wlodarczyk v. State, 836 P.2d 279,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 80

(Wyo. 1992).

Cited

in

King v. State, 720 P.2d 465,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 566

(Wyo. 1986).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “The Institutional Transfer Statute: Three Challenges to the Imprisonment of Juvenile Offenders,” see XVII Land & Water L. Rev. 643 (1982).

For article, "Unpaid Restitution: An Underenforced Right of Victimsand Suggestions to Improve the Collection of Restitution in Wyoming”, see 12 Wyo. L. Rev. 367 (2012).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Right to notice and hearing before revocation of suspension of sentence, 29 ALR2d 1074, 44 ALR3d 306.

Propriety of conditioning probation on defendant's remaining childless or having no additional children during probationary period, 94 ALR3d 1218.

Propriety of conditioning probation on defendant's serving part of probationary period in jail or prison, 6 ALR4th 446.

Power of court to revoke probation for acts committed after imposition of sentence but prior to commencement of probation term, 22 ALR4th 755.

Propriety of increased sentence following revocation of probation, 23 ALR4th 883.

Power of state court, during same term, to increase severity of lawful sentence — modern status, 26 ALR4th 905.

Probation revocation: insanity as defense, 56 ALR4th 1178.

§ 7-13-306.
Payment of fine in installments.

When imposing a fine and also placing the defendant on probation, the district judge may permit the fine to be paid in installments over a reasonable period of time.

History.

Laws 1939, ch. 91, § 5; C.S. 1945, § 10-1905; W.S. 1957, § 7-322; W.S. 1977, §

7-13-305

; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3.

Applied

in

Hamburg v. State, 820 P.2d 523,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 166

(Wyo. 1991).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity, construction, and application of state statute requiring inmate to reimburse government for expense of incarceration, 13 ALR5th 872.

§ 7-13-307.
Expungement of criminal record.

Nothing in W.S.

7-13-301

through

7-13-306

shall be construed to authorize the court to expunge the record of a person charged with or convicted of a criminal offense.

History.

Laws 1939, ch. 91, § 6; C.S. 1945, § 10-1906; W.S. 1957, § 7-323; W.S. 1977, §

7-13-306

; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3.

Severability. —

Laws 1939, ch. 91, § 8, provides: “The legislature hereby declares that it would have passed this act and each and every section, subsection, sentence, clause and phrase thereof, irrespective of the fact that any 1 or more other sections, subsections, sentences, clauses or phrases thereof may be declared unconstitutional.”

Repealing clauses. —

Laws 1939, ch. 91, § 7, repealed all laws and parts of laws in conflict therewith.